apertium-uum.uum.lexd
LEXICON Conj-Root
эбет:эбет
ама:ама

LEXICON Prep-Root
илен:илен # "with"
чине:чине # in, to <like locative>

LEXICON Abbr-Root
А:А #A
В:В #B
С:С #C
Д:Д #D
I:I #E
Ф:Ф #F
Г:Г #G
K:K #K
М:М #M
П:П #P

LEXICON Num-Root
бир:бир # one
этʼи:этʼи # two etc
ӱч:ӱч
дӧрт:дӧрт 
беш:беш
алты:алты
йеди:йеди
сетʼи:сетʼи
дохуз:дохуз
он:он # 10
дʼирим:дʼирим # 20
отуз:отуз # 30
хырх:хырх # 40
элли:элли # 50
алтмыш:алтмыш # 60
йетмиш:йетмиш # 70
сексен:сексен # 80
дохсан:дохсан # 90
йӱз:йӱз # 100
бин:бин # 1000

LEXICON Part-Root
э:дэ
да:да
йа:йа
вар:вар
йох:йох
чаре:чаре
лазым:лазым
му:му
лазымды:лазымды
варды:варды
лазым:лазым 
йохтурду:йохтурду
дӧгӱль:дӧгӱль
а:а

LEXICON Intj-Root
эй:эй
о:о
штэ:штэ 
ах:ах 

LEXICON UNKNOWN
ону:ону
айтый:айтый # might be ай
та:та
анда:анда
йох:йох
она:она # он = 10?
дер:дер
иди:иди
ки:ки
де:де # ????
ичӱн:ичӱн # added ?
ем:ем
этʼен:этʼен # "two" два
эди:эди
ао:ао
ве:ве
дэди:дэди # ди - to say
бен:бен
йа:йа
аман:аман # ама - but, however
тэ:тэ
олду:олду # maybe a form of "to be"
тʼитий:тʼитий # тий - to wear
сени:сени # might be a form of сен
мы:мы
маа:маа
беле:беле # might be бела:бела - беда 
олур:олур # sounds similar, but theres only  олар and ол 
саа:саа  
олан:олан # again, idk. ол - a verb. to be
оса:оса
сана:сана
олсун:олсун
осун:осун
хадар:хадар
йохтур:йохтур
беним:беним
я:я
тʼерек:тʼерек # тʼере - раз
ми:ми
эдим:эдим
тʼитти:тʼитти
олуй:олуй
меэм:меэм
дӧгӱль:дӧгӱль
ӧзӱ:ӧзӱ
мында:мында
дэр:дэр
абу:абу
лер:лер
оон:оон

LEXICON V-Root[ir]
ди:ди[iv] # "say"
дэ:дэ[iv] # "say"
эн:эн[iv]
сар:сар[tv]
ӧс:ӧс[iv]
йелир:йелир[iv]
эниш:эниш[iv]
севин:севин[iv]
кийдир:кийдир[iv]
ишит:ишит[iv]
ачтыр:ачтыр[iv]
хутхар:хутхар[tv]
сахла:сахла[iv]
уруң:уруң[iv]
кель:кел{ь}[iv]
хонуш:хонуш[iv]
хорхун:хорхун[iv]
хон:хон[iv]
йырла:йырла[iv]
бағла:бағла[tv]
кӧрӱн:кӧрӱн[iv]  # "be visible"
чайна:чайна[tv]
улан:улан[iv]
гырылда:гырылда[iv]
ал:ал[tv]
башла:башла[tv]
бар:бар[iv]
бах:бах[tv,ar,-ir]   # "look at, watch"
биль:биль[iv]
билий:билий[iv]
билир:билир[iv]
блий:блий[iv]
биль:бил{ь}[tv]
бул:бул[tv]
була:була[tv]
вер:вер[tv]
кӧр:кӧр[tv]
кӧр:кӧр[tv,ar,-ir]   # "see" Dir/LR
отур:от{у}р[iv]
отур:отур[iv] # Dir/LR
ӧгрен:ӧгрен[iv]
сӧле:сӧле[iv]        # "speak"
шит:шит[tv]
чых:чых[iv,ar,-ir]   # "go out"
тʼель:тʼель[iv]
тʼетир:тʼетир[tv]
тʼет:тʼет[iv]
ол:ол[iv]
вар:вар[iv] 
йут:йут[tv]
шоп:шоп[tv]
йар:йар[tv]
ал:ал[tv]       # "take"
хал:хал[iv]     # "stay"
халдыр:халдыр[tv]
ах:ах[iv]
дӧг:дӧг[iv]
вах:вах[iv]
доғ:доғ[iv]
э:э[tv]
уч:уч[iv] # "fly"
хон:хон[iv]
хыр:хыр[tv]
айт:айт[iv] # "speak"
хой:хой[tv,ar,-ir] # "put"
оху:оху[tv] # "read"
оху:оху[iv] # "read"
ат:ат[iv] # "jump across"
ат:ат[tv] # "throw; shoot"

PATTERN Number
Numeral+ [<num>:]

LEXICON Numeral
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9

#LEXICON Plurality
#пычах<n><pl>:пычахлар
#хыз<n><pl>:хызлар
#хурйух<n><pl>:хурйухлар
#от<n><pl>:отлар
#эль<n><pl>:эллер
#тиш<n><pl>:тишлер
#кӧз<n><pl>:кӧзлер
#гÿль<n><pl>:гÿллер


LEXICON Punctuation

.<sent>:.
..<sent>:..
...<sent>:...
;<sent>:;
\:<sent>:\:
!<sent>:!
-<guio>:-
—<guio>:—
,<cm>:,
?<sent>:? 
'<apos>:'
"<quot>:"
«<lquot>:«
»<rquot>:»
”<rquot>:”
“<lquot>:“
(<lpar>:(
\]<rpar>:\]
\[<lpar>:\[
)<rpar>:)
\\<sent>:\\
\/<sent>:\/


# Resources:
# https://github.com/apertium/lexd/blob/master/Usage.md
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
# https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
# https://github.com/hfst/
# https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
